Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-131
Specially constructed vehicle, defined.

Specially constructed vehicle means a vehicle which was not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, or type by a manufacturer of vehicles. The term specially constructed vehicle includes kit vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 31.